Utah statutes.
77-3-1.   Threatened offense -- Complaint.

A complaint that a person has threatened to commit an offense against the person or property of another, except in the case of stalking, may be made before any magistrate.  Petitions alleging the commission of stalking shall be handled pursuant to Title 77, Chapter 3a, Stalking Injunctions.



Amended by Chapter 276, 2001 General Session

